Maryland, session 2026, SB0267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
1–103.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ENTITY” MEANS:
(1) A CORPORATION;
(2) A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY;
(3) A LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP;
(4) A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP;
(5) A LIMITED LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP;
(6) A PROFESSIONAL CORPORATION;
(7) A TRADE NAME FILER; OR
(8) A BUSINESS TRUST.
(B) (1) AT EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AT LEAST ONCE PER YEAR, EACH ENTITY THAT OWNS RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY IN THE STATE THAT THE ENTITY RENTS OR INTENDS TO RENT FOR
RESIDENTIAL USE SHALL FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT A CERTIFICATE DISCLOSING
THE CORRECT CONTACT INFORMATION FOR A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ENTITY
WHO HAS THE AUTHORITY TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE PUBLIC ABOUT THE ENTITY.
(2) THE CERTIFICATE SHALL BE:

SENATE BILL 267
(I) IN WRITING; AND
(II) AFFIRMED OR ACKNOWLEDGED UNDER OATH.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ENTITY THAT
PROVIDES CONTACT INFORMATION FOR A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ENTITY WHO
HAS THE AUTHORITY TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE PUBLIC ABOUT THE ENTITY TO A
UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT AT LEAST ONCE PER YEAR IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF A LOCAL ORDINANCE OR PROGRAM.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION ON REQUEST BY A UNIT OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IN THE STATE.
Article – Land Use
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans),
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);

SENATE BILL 267 5
(12) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(13) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(14) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
(15) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
(16) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
(17) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(18) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family child
care homes);
(19) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
(20) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
(21) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
(22) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
(23) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
(24) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title 7,
Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
(25) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
(26) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
(27) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
(28) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County Provisions
– Baltimore County);
(29) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
(30) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County Provisions
– Howard County);
(31) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County Provisions
– Talbot County); [and]

SENATE BILL 267
(32) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty); AND
(33) TITLE 12 (HOUSING REGULATIONS, TARGETS, AND
AFFORDABILITY).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
7–106.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT” MEANS THE NEW
CONSTRUCTION OR SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION OF A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE
PROJECT.
(3) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION” MEANS AN
APPLICATION FOR A BUILDING PERMIT, CERTIFICATION, AUTHORIZATION, SITE
PLAN APPROVAL, SUBDIVISION APPROVAL, CONCEPTUAL PLAN, OR ANY OTHER
DETERMINATION BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION RELATING TO A HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT THAT HAS BEEN SUBMITTED TO A LOCAL JURISDICTION IN
COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS.
(B) AFTER MAKING A DETERMINATION THAT THERE IS A SHORTAGE OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING IN A LOCAL JURISDICTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY ESTABLISH, BY LOCAL LAW, AN ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCESS TO REVIEW, APPROVE, MODIFY, OR DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT APPLICATION.
(C) A LOCAL LAW THAT ESTABLISHES AN ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) DESIGNATE THE DEPARTMENT, OFFICIAL, OR STAFF THAT WILL
IMPLEMENT THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS;
(2) PROVIDE THE PROCEDURES, CRITERIA, AND CONDITIONS FOR
THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS;
(3) REQUIRE REASONABLE PUBLIC NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY FOR
PUBLIC COMMENT DURING THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS; AND
(4) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO APPEAL A DECISION MADE THROUGH
THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS.

SENATE BILL 267 7
(D) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION TO REVIEW,
APPROVE, OR DENY ANY MATTER UNDER ITS JURISDICTION; OR
(2) UNLESS AUTHORIZED BY LOCAL LAW, TRANSFER THE AUTHORITY
OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION TO MAKE A FINAL DECISION REGARDING A MATTER
DECIDED THROUGH THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCESS.
10–103.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
(13) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(14) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(15) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);

SENATE BILL 267
(16) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(17) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family child
care homes);
(18) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
(19) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
(20) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
(21) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
(22) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
(23) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
(24) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); [and]
(25) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty); AND
(26) TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 (QUALIFIED AFFORDABLE HOUSING
PROJECTS).
TITLE 12. HOUSING REGULATIONS, TARGETS, AND AFFORDABILITY.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS.
12–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND
PLANNING COMMISSION.
(C) “COMPLETE APPLICATION” MEANS THE INITIAL SUBMITTAL OF AN
APPLICATION WITH ALL MATERIALS AND INFORMATION REQUIRED FOR
PROCESSING AND SUBSTANTIVE REVIEW AS DEFINED AND DETERMINED BY THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION.
(D) “MIXED–USE” MEANS ANY COMBINATION OF A RESIDENTIAL USE WITH
RETAIL, COMMERCIAL, OFFICE, OR SERVICE USES IN THE SAME BUILDING OR ON

SENATE BILL 267 9
THE SAME SITE, WITH PERCENTAGES, DETERMINED BY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION
OR THE COMMISSION, ALLOCATED FOR EACH USE.
(E) “RESIDENTIAL” MEANS ANY USE APPROVED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION
OR THE COMMISSION THAT IS FOR EXISTING OR PROPOSED DWELLING UNITS.
SUBTITLE 2. REGULATORY AND CONSTRUCTION CERTAINTY.
12–201.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF AT LEAST 150,000 RESIDENTS,
NOT INCLUDING ANY RESIDENTS OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION LOCATED WITHIN
THE COUNTY; AND
(2) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
12–202.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH LOCAL
JURISDICTION AND THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO EVALUATE
THE COMPLETENESS OF RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
APPLICATIONS.
(2) (I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION, A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE
COMMISSION SHALL MAKE A DETERMINATION AS TO WHETHER THE APPLICATION IS
A COMPLETE APPLICATION.
(II) AFTER MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION SHALL:
1. PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE APPLICANT OF THE
DETERMINATION AND THE DATE OF THE DETERMINATION; AND
2. IF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION
HAS DETERMINED THAT THE APPLICATION IS NOT A COMPLETE APPLICATION,
PROVIDE THE APPLICANT WITH A LIST OF DEFICIENCIES AND A TIME FRAME FOR
CURING THE DEFICIENCIES.
(3) (I) IF DURING THE APPLICATION REVIEW PROCESS AN
APPLICANT FAILS TO RESPOND TO A REQUEST FROM A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE

SENATE BILL 267
COMMISSION FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION OR APPLICATION AMENDMENTS, THE
PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY TO THE
APPLICATION.
(II) A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION SHALL
ESTABLISH THE TIME FRAME FOR RESPONSES REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH
BEFORE THE SUBMISSION OF THE APPLICATION.
(B) (1) FOR PURPOSES OF ESTABLISHING REGULATORY CERTAINTY,
AFTER VERIFICATION BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION THAT A
RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION IS COMPLETE,
AND FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED 3 YEARS UNLESS EXTENDED BY THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION:
(I) A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION SHALL
PROCESS AND REVIEW ANY APPLICATION FOR ZONING, SUBDIVISION, OR LAND
DEVELOPMENT APPROVAL USING THE LAND USE REGULATIONS, ZONING
ORDINANCES, AND DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS IN EFFECT ON THE DATE THE
APPLICATION IS VERIFIED TO BE COMPLETE; AND
(II) THE STATE MAY NOT IMPOSE NEW REGULATORY
DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS ON THE RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT APPLICATION.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, LOCAL REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING IMPACT FEES OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED LAND USE REGULATIONS, ZONING ORDINANCES, OR DEVELOPMENT
STANDARDS.
(C) FOR THE PURPOSE OF ESTABLISHING CONSTRUCTION CERTAINTY,
AFTER RECEIPT OF FINAL APPROVAL OF A RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE
COMMISSION:
(1) THE LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION MAY NOT IMPOSE
NEW DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS OR DOWNZONE LAND DURING THE APPROVAL
PERIOD OF THE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION; AND
(2) THE LOCAL JURISDICTION, THE COMMISSION, OR THE STATE MAY
NOT IMPOSE NEW DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS DURING THE APPROVAL PERIOD OF
THE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:

SENATE BILL 267 11
(1) PREVENT THE APPLICATION OF REGULATIONS THAT ARE
ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE LAW AND NECESSARY TO PROTECT
PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY;
(2) EXTEND ANY ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITY APPROVAL
REQUIREMENTS BEYOND THE TIME FRAME APPROVED BY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION
OR THE COMMISSION;
(3) ALLOW A RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
TO BEGIN OR CONTINUE CONSTRUCTION IF THE ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITY
APPROVAL HAS EXPIRED;
(4) PREVENT THE EXPIRATION OF AN APPROVAL OF A RESIDENTIAL
OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION OR PERMIT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE LAWS OR REGULATIONS OF THE STATE, A LOCAL JURISDICTION, OR THE
COMMISSION; OR
(5) LIMIT THE ABILITY OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE
COMMISSION TO:
(I) EXTEND THE DURATION OF A VALID PERMIT FOR A
RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;
(II) EXECUTE A DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES
AGREEMENT UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 3 AND TITLE 25, SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS
ARTICLE; OR
(III) APPROVE A ZONING TEXT AMENDMENT, APPLICATION FOR
REZONING, OR OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT TO INCREASE THE DENSITY OF A
RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT BEYOND THE MAXIMUM
ALLOWABLE AMOUNT AT THE TIME A COMPLETE APPLICATION IS VERIFIED.
(E) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION APPLY TO A LOCAL
JURISDICTION AND THE COMMISSION ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
REQUIREMENTS DO NOT CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL LAWS OR
REGULATIONS.
SUBTITLE 3. HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS.
12–301.

SENATE BILL 267
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2031, AND EACH JANUARY 1 FOLLOWING A
UNITED STATES DECENNIAL CENSUS THROUGH JANUARY 1, 2051, THE GOVERNOR
OR THE GOVERNOR’S DESIGNEE SHALL ESTABLISH HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS
FOR:
(1) THE STATE;
(2) EACH COUNTY; AND
(3) EACH MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT EXERCISES ZONING OR
PLANNING AUTHORITY.
(B) IN ESTABLISHING THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNOR SHALL:
(1) ANALYZE DATA AND FORECASTS RELATED TO:
(I) EMPLOYMENT DEMAND;
(II) HOUSING DEMAND;
(III) POPULATION GROWTH;
(IV) INFRASTRUCTURE CAPACITY AND CONSTRAINTS; AND
(V) ANY OTHER RELATED INFORMATION;
(2) CONSULT WITH EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT MAY HAVE
HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(3) CONSULT WITH THE COMMISSION ABOUT HOUSING PRODUCTION
TARGETS THAT MAY BE ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE COMMISSION’S JURISDICTION.
(C) THE GOVERNOR SHALL:
(1) REEVALUATE AND REVISE THE ESTABLISHED HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS; AND
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF
COUNTIES AND THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL LEAGUE, DEVELOP METRICS TO
MEASURE THE PROGRESS TOWARD THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS.

SENATE BILL 267 13
(D) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL PUBLISH THE CURRENT HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION ON THE GOVERNOR’S
WEBSITE AND NOTIFY EACH APPLICABLE LOCAL JURISDICTION AND THE
COMMISSION OF THE TARGETS IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(2) THE PUBLICATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PROVIDE A
SUPPORTING BASIS FOR THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS THAT ARE
ESTABLISHED.
(3) WITHIN 1 MONTH AFTER THE PUBLICATION OF HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGETS, THE GOVERNOR SHALL SUBMIT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A REPORT ON THE INFORMATION
PUBLISHED REGARDING HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 FOLLOWING PUBLICATION OF THE
HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS AND ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR SHALL PUBLISH A REPORT THAT:
(I) IDENTIFIES THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS FOR THE
STATE AND EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION;
(II) ASSESSES THE CUMULATIVE PROGRESS AND THE PROGRESS
FOR THE PRIOR YEAR OF THE STATE AND EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION TOWARD
MEETING APPLICABLE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS USING THE METRICS
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) FOR ANY HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET THAT THE
GOVERNOR DETERMINES IS NOT PRACTICABLY MEASURED BY THE METRICS
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDES AN
EXPLANATION THAT THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET MAY NOT BE PRACTICABLY
MEASURED AND A DESCRIPTION OF THE STATUS TOWARD ACHIEVING THE HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGET; AND
(IV) PROVIDES A SUPPORTING BASIS FOR ANY ALTERATION TO
AN ESTABLISHED HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET.
(2) (I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL PUBLISH THE REPORT ON THE
GOVERNOR’S WEBSITE AND NOTIFY EACH APPLICABLE LOCAL JURISDICTION AND
THE COMMISSION OF THE REPORT IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(II) WITHIN 1 MONTH AFTER THE PUBLICATION OF THE REPORT
REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE GOVERNOR SHALL SUBMIT

SENATE BILL 267
THE REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
12–302.
(A) (1) IF THE COMMISSION OR A LOCAL JURISDICTION DISAGREES WITH
THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–301 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY PROPOSE AN ALTERNATIVE HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGET IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) WITHIN 180 DAYS AFTER THE GOVERNOR PROVIDES THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER § 12–301(D)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION OR A LOCAL
JURISDICTION SHALL NOTIFY THE GOVERNOR OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S
PROPOSED ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET BY SUBMITTING WRITTEN
JUSTIFICATION THAT INCLUDES:
(I) LOCAL DATA ON HOUSING NEED AND DEMAND;
(II) PLANNING AND ZONING CAPACITY;
(III) INFRASTRUCTURE AVAILABILITY OR CONSTRAINTS;
(IV) ENVIRONMENTAL OR TOPOGRAPHIC LIMITATIONS; AND
(V) ANY OTHER RELEVANT LOCAL CONSIDERATIONS.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A PROPOSED ALTERNATIVE HOUSING
PRODUCTION TARGET, THE GOVERNOR SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE SUBMISSION FOR CONSISTENCY WITH
STATEWIDE GOALS AND METHODOLOGIES USED TO DETERMINE THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION’S HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET; AND
(II) CONSIDER THE WRITTEN JUSTIFICATION PROVIDED BY THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(C) (1) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE PROPOSED
ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ISSUE A
WRITTEN DECISION ADOPTING, MODIFYING, OR REJECTING THE PROPOSED
ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET.
(2) IF THE GOVERNOR DOES NOT ADOPT, REJECT, OR MODIFY THE
ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF

SENATE BILL 267 15
THE PROPOSED ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET, THE PROPOSED
ALTERNATIVE SHALL BE DEEMED APPROVED.
(3) IF THE GOVERNOR MODIFIES OR REJECTS THE PROPOSED
ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY
REQUEST A CONFERENCE WITH THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE TO REVIEW AND
CONSIDER ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGETS.
(4) IF THE GOVERNOR AND THE LOCAL JURISDICTION DO NOT AGREE
ON A HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET, THE GOVERNOR SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE THE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET FOR THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION; AND
(II) INCLUDE THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S PROPOSED
ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PRODUCTION TARGET AND THE JUSTIFICATION FOR THE
TARGET AS AN APPENDIX TO THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 12–301(D)
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SUBTITLE 4. QUALIFIED AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS.
12–401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNIT” MEANS A DWELLING UNIT THAT IS
AFFORDABLE TO HOUSEHOLDS EARNING 60% OR LESS OF THE AREA MEDIAN
INCOME.
(C) “AREA MEDIAN INCOME” MEANS THE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD INCOME FOR
THE AREA ADJUSTED FOR HOUSEHOLD SIZE AS PUBLISHED AND ANNUALLY
UPDATED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT.
(D) “HOUSING–SENSITIVE FEE” MEANS A DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE
AUTHORIZED UNDER TITLE 20, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE
OR ANY OTHER LAW.
(E) (1) “HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX” INCLUDES:
(I) A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX AUTHORIZED UNDER TITLE
20, SUBTITLE 8 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE OR ANY OTHER PUBLIC
GENERAL OR PUBLIC LOCAL LAW;

SENATE BILL 267
(II) THE RECORDATION TAX IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 12 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE COUNTY TRANSFER TAX AUTHORIZED UNDER TITLE 13,
SUBTITLE 4 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(2) “HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX” DOES NOT INCLUDE A TAX
AUTHORIZED OR IMPOSED BY:
(I) A COUNTY CHARTER; OR
(II) A PUBLIC LOCAL LAW THAT AUTHORIZES GENERAL TAXING
AUTHORITY.
(F) “QUALIFIED AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECT” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL
PROJECT THAT:
(1) CONSISTS OF NEW CONSTRUCTION OR SUBSTANTIAL
RENOVATION, AS ANNUALLY ESTABLISHED AND IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT IN THE MULTIFAMILY RENTAL
FINANCING PROGRAM GUIDE;
(2) CONTAINS AT LEAST 25% OF UNITS THAT ARE AFFORDABLE; AND
(3) IS DEED–RESTRICTED TO INCLUDE 25% OF UNITS THAT ARE
AFFORDABLE DWELLING UNITS FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 40 YEARS.
12–402.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF AT LEAST 150,000 RESIDENTS,
NOT INCLUDING ANY RESIDENTS OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION LOCATED WITHIN
THE COUNTY; AND
(2) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
12–403.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION AND
THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT LOCAL PROJECT DESIGN GUIDELINES FOR

SENATE BILL 267 17
QUALIFIED AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECTS THAT INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS
CONCERNING:
(I) PARKING;
(II) MAXIMUM HEIGHT;
(III) SETBACK;
(IV) LOT AREA;
(V) OPEN SPACE;
(VI) INTERNAL VEHICLE AND PEDESTRIAN MOVEMENT;
(VII) LANDSCAPING;
(VIII) LIGHTING;
(IX) ARCHITECTURE; AND
(X) SIGNAGE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A
LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION FROM REQUIRING A QUALIFIED
AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECT APPLICATION TO COMPLY WITH STANDARDS THAT
ARE MORE DETAILED OR STRINGENT THAN LOCAL PROJECT DESIGN GUIDELINES.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION AND
THE COMMISSION SHALL IMPLEMENT A PRE–APPROVAL BUILDING PERMIT
APPLICATION PROCESS FOR STANDARDIZED MODEL HOME DESIGNS.
(2) THE PROCESS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) ALLOW BUILDERS AND DEVELOPERS TO SUBMIT MODEL
HOME DESIGNS FOR REVIEW AND APPROVAL BEFORE THE SUBMISSION OF
INDIVIDUAL BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS;
(II) ENSURE THAT APPROVED MODEL PLANS ARE RETAINED BY
THE LOCAL JURISDICTION OR THE COMMISSION FOR REFERENCE AND REUSE
THROUGHOUT THE DURATION OF ANY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;

SENATE BILL 267
(III) ELIMINATE REDUNDANT PLAN REVIEWS FOR EACH
SUBSEQUENT PERMIT APPLICATION USING AN APPROVED MODEL DESIGN,
PROVIDED THAT NO SUBSTANTIVE CHANGES ARE MADE TO THE APPLICATION;
(IV) REDUCE PERMIT PROCESSING TIMES FOR PRODUCTION
HOMES IN APPROVED SUBDIVISIONS; AND
(V) MAINTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE BUILDING
CODES, ZONING REGULATIONS, AND DESIGN STANDARDS.
12–404.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW THAT LIMITS A
HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX OR HOUSING–SENSITIVE FEE, ON A FINDING BY A COUNTY
THAT THE COUNTY HAS A SHORTFALL IN TOTAL HOUSING UNITS OR A CLASS OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS THE COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LOCAL LAW:
(1) A REDUCED HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX RATE OR
HOUSING–SENSITIVE FEE FOR A QUALIFIED AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECT; OR
(2) AN EXEMPTION FOR A QUALIFIED AFFORDABLE HOUSING
PROJECT.
(B) A LOCAL LAW THAT ESTABLISHES A REDUCED RATE OR EXEMPTION
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE OF LIMITED DURATION OR
SUBJECT TO TERMINATION BASED ON QUANTIFIABLE FACTORS THAT DETERMINE
THE EXISTENCE OF A SHORTFALL IN TOTAL HOUSING UNITS OR A CLASS OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS IN THE COUNTY.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW THAT LIMITS A
HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX OR HOUSING–SENSITIVE FEE, A COUNTY THAT ADOPTS A
REDUCED HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX RATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
MAY ESTABLISH HIGHER HOUSING–SENSITIVE TAX RATES OR HOUSING–SENSITIVE
FEES FOR CLASSES OF REAL PROPERTY THAT ARE NOT PART OF A QUALIFIED
AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECT.
Article – Local Government
20–128.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 267 19
(2) “DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX” MEANS AN EXCISE TAX IMPOSED BY
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ON THE CONSTRUCTION OR IMPROVEMENT OF A
BUILDING.
(3) “DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE” MEANS A FEE IMPOSED BY A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FINANCING THE CAPITAL COSTS
OF ADDITIONAL OR EXPANDED PUBLIC WORKS, IMPROVEMENTS, AND FACILITIES
REQUIRED TO ACCOMMODATE NEW CONSTRUCTION OR DEVELOPMENT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) BALTIMORE CITY;
(2) A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF AT LEAST 150,000 RESIDENTS,
NOT INCLUDING ANY RESIDENTS OF A MUNICIPALITY WITHIN THE COUNTY; AND
(3) A MUNICIPALITY.
(C) (1) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY REQUIRE UP TO 50% OF THE
FULL PAYMENT OF A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE
IMPOSED ON A RESIDENTIAL UNIT, INCLUDING A RESIDENTIAL UNIT THAT IS PART
OF A MIXED–USE PROJECT, AS A PRECONDITION FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A BUILDING
PERMIT.
(2) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY REQUIRE THE REMAINING OR
FULL PAYMENT OF A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE
IMPOSED ON A RESIDENTIAL UNIT, INCLUDING A RESIDENTIAL UNIT THAT IS PART
OF A MIXED–USE PROJECT AS A PRECONDITION BEFORE THE ISSUANCE OF A
CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, OCCUPANCY PERMIT, OR OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT
APPLICABLE TO THE RESIDENTIAL UNIT.
Article – Real Property
10–804.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 6–201 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “REAL ESTATE ENTERPRISE” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT:

SENATE BILL 267
(I) IS CONDUCTED BY ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS;
(II) OWNS REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING IN A TENANCY BY THE
ENTIRETY; AND
(III) IS INVOLVED IN BUYING, SELLING, LEASING, OR MANAGING
REAL PROPERTY.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE SALE OF IMPROVED,
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A SALE IN AN ACTION TO
FORECLOSE A MORTGAGE, A DEED OF TRUST, OR ANY OTHER LIEN.
(C) DURING THE FIRST 30 DAYS AFTER A PERSON OFFERS A PROPERTY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION FOR SALE TO A THIRD PARTY, THE PERSON MAY ACCEPT
AN OFFER TO PURCHASE THE PROPERTY MADE ONLY BY:
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL;
(2) A COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATION;
(3) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION; OR
(4) A REAL ESTATE ENTERPRISE THAT OWNS AN INTEREST IN LESS
THAN 3% OF ALL RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY LOCATED WITHIN THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
Article – Tax – Property
SUBTITLE 6. TRANSFER TAX ON TRANSFERS OF OWNER–OCCUPIED PROPERTIES.
13–601.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “OWNER–OCCUPIED PROPERTY”:
(1) MEANS REAL PROPERTY THAT IS USED AS THE PRIMARY
RESIDENCE BY THE OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY;
(2) INCLUDES A PROPERTY THAT IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE HOMESTEAD
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER § 9–105 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY
ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 267 21
(3) DOES NOT INCLUDE REAL PROPERTY THAT IS RENTED OR HELD
FOR INVESTMENT PURPOSES.
13–602.
(A) (1) ON A FINDING BY A COUNTY THERE IS A SHORTFALL IN TOTAL
HOUSING UNITS OR A CLASS OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNITS THE COUNTY MAY
ESTABLISH, BY LOCAL LAW, A TAX ON THE TRANSFER OF OWNER–OCCUPIED
PROPERTY IF FOLLOWING THE TRANSFER THE PROPERTY IS NO LONGER
OWNER–OCCUPIED.
(2) THE TAX AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY TO IMPOSE A TRANSFER TAX
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(3) THE RATE OF THE TAX AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED 5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
TRANSFER.
(B) IF A TRANSFER OF A PROPERTY RESULTS IN A PORTION OF THE
PROPERTY BEING OWNER–OCCUPIED AND A PORTION OF THE PROPERTY NOT BEING
OWNER–OCCUPIED, THE TAX APPLIES TO THE CONSIDERATION PAID FOR THE
PORTION OF THE PROPERTY THAT WILL NOT BE OWNER–OCCUPIED PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
6–202.1.
(A) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county may establish, by law, a subclass of real property consisting of vacant lots or
improved property cited as vacant and unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a
housing or building violation notice.
(B) (1) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LAW, A SUBCLASS OF REAL
PROPERTY LOCATED IN A PRIORITY FUNDING AREA, AS DESIGNATED IN TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 7B OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THAT
CONSISTS OF UNDEVELOPED, UNDERUTILIZED, OR VACANT LAND THAT IS ZONED
FOR RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT.

SENATE BILL 267
(2) A LAW AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
THAT ESTABLISHES A SUBCLASS OF REAL PROPERTY SHALL:
(I) DEFINE UNDEVELOPED, UNDERUTILIZED, AND VACANT
LAND; AND
(II) BE DESIGNED TO DISCOURAGE SPECULATIVE
LANDHOLDING AND PROMOTE TIMELY DEVELOPMENT CONSISTENT WITH THE
LOCAL MASTER PLAN AND INFRASTRUCTURE SUPPORT.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE” MEANS A
PROPERTY THAT AN INDIVIDUAL PRIMARILY RESIDES IN AND IS THE ADDRESS
LISTED ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTING CARD, DRIVER’S LICENSE, AND INCOME TAX
RETURN.
(2) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LAW, A SUBCLASS OF REAL
PROPERTY THAT IS:
(I) RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS NOT THE OWNER’S
PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE; AND
(II) OWNED BY AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT OWNS AT LEAST
20 RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTIES WITHIN BALTIMORE CITY OR THE COUNTY.
(3) A LOCAL LAW THAT ESTABLISHES A SUBCLASS OF REAL
PROPERTY UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT INCLUDE REAL
PROPERTY THAT IS:
(I) ACTIVELY RENTED AT AFFORDABLE HOUSING RATES AS
DEFINED BY THE LOCAL LAW; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO HOUSING AFFORDABILITY COVENANTS OR
SUBSIDIES.
6–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and after complying with § 6–305
of this subtitle, in each year after the date of finality and before the following June 20, the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of each county annually
shall set the tax rate for the next taxable year on all assessments of property subject to that
county’s property tax.

SENATE BILL 267 23
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection (c)] SUBSECTIONS (C), (E), AND (F)
of this section and §§ 6–305 and 6–306 of this subtitle:
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.
(c) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county may set a special rate for a vacant lot or improved property cited as vacant and
unfit for habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building violation notice.
(2) On or before December 1 each year, the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore City or the governing body of a county that enacts a special rate under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall report to the Department of Housing and Community
Development and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
General Assembly on:
(i) the special rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection;
(ii) the number of properties to which the special rate applies;
(iii) the revenue change resulting from the special rate;
(iv) the use of the revenue from the special rate; and
(v) whether properties subject to the special rate are viable for
adaptive reuse, as defined in § 1–102 of the Housing and Community Development Article,
and plans to convert viable properties.
(d) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City may, by law, impose on real
property that would otherwise be exempt from property tax under § 7–202 or § 7–204 of
this article the general property tax rate set under subsection (b)(1)(i) of this section and
the special rate authorized under subsection (c)(1) of this section if the real property is:
(1) a vacant lot; or
(2) improved property cited as vacant and unfit for habitation or other
authorized use on a housing or building violation notice.

SENATE BILL 267
(E) (1) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY SET A SPECIAL RATE FOR REAL PROPERTY
LOCATED IN A PRIORITY FUNDING AREA, AS DESIGNATED IN TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 7B
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THAT CONSISTS OF
UNDEVELOPED, UNDERUTILIZED, OR VACANT LAND THAT IS ZONED FOR
RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT.
(2) THE REVENUE FROM THE SPECIAL RATE AUTHORIZED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED ONLY FOR AFFORDABLE
HOUSING PROGRAMS, SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION, AND PURPOSES DIRECTLY RELATED
TO FACILITATING HOUSING CONSTRUCTION.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE” MEANS A
PROPERTY THAT AN INDIVIDUAL PRIMARILY RESIDES IN AND IS THE ADDRESS
LISTED ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTING CARD, DRIVER’S LICENSE, AND INCOME TAX
RETURN.
(2) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY SET A SPECIAL RATE FOR REAL PROPERTY
THAT IS:
(I) RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS NOT THE OWNER’S
PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE; AND
(II) OWNED BY AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT OWNS AT LEAST
20 RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTIES WITHIN BALTIMORE CITY OR THE COUNTY.
(3) THE REVENUE FROM THE SPECIAL RATE AUTHORIZED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED ONLY FOR AFFORDABLE
HOUSING PROGRAMS, SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION, AND PURPOSES DIRECTLY RELATED
TO FACILITATING HOUSING CONSTRUCTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 31, 2027, the Comptroller, in consultation with the
State Department of Assessments and Taxation, shall evaluate and report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly,
on changes to State–level tax policies to reduce the disincentives to homeowners, including
older adults and families, to downsize or transition to smaller and more affordable homes.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) include recommendations regarding capital gains taxation and tax
deferrals or exemptions; and

SENATE BILL 267 25
(2) consider the impact of property tax reassessment practices and housing
turnover rates.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) The Department of Planning shall conduct a study and publish a
comprehensive report on housing infrastructure to assess how existing and planned
infrastructure systems support or constrain housing development across the State.
(2) The comprehensive report on housing infrastructure shall be organized
into the following four primary parts:
(i) water and sewer infrastructure;
(ii) school facility capacity;
(iii) transportation infrastructure; and
(iv) policy recommendations.
(b) (1) The water and sewer infrastructure part of the report shall:
(i) evaluate the interrelationship between current and projected
housing development patterns and the availability, condition, and capacity of water and
wastewater infrastructure; and
(ii) include an analysis of:
1. existing public water and sewer service areas, including
coverage gaps;
2. capacity constraints of wastewater treatment plants;
3. the availability and sustainability of private wells;
4. the use and environmental impact of septic systems; and
5. the age, condition, and maintenance needs of water and
sewer infrastructure.
(2) The Department of Planning shall consult and coordinate with the
following entities in developing the water and sewer infrastructure part of the report:
(i) the Department of Environment;
(ii) the Maryland Department of Health;

SENATE BILL 267
(iii) the Department of Housing and Community Development;
(iv) the Maryland Municipal League;
(v) the Maryland Association of Counties;
(vi) the Maryland Building Industry Association;
(vii) the Maryland Association of Housing and Community
Development Agencies;
(viii) the Maryland Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies;
and
(ix) the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
(c) (1) The school facility capacity part of the report shall:
(i) assess the impact of housing development on public school
capacity across jurisdictions, including the ability of local education systems to
accommodate projected student enrollment growth associated with new housing; and
(ii) include an analysis of:
1. local and regional school facility utilization and capacity;
2. enrollment projections linked to housing development
trends;
3. State and local school construction funding processes; and
4. the adequacy of current school capacity assessment
methods.
(2) The Department of Planning shall consult and coordinate with the
following entities in developing the school facility capacity part of the report:
(i) the Interagency Commission on School Construction;
(ii) the State Department of Education;
(iii) the Public School Superintendents’ Association of Maryland;
(iv) the Maryland Association of Board of Education; and
(v) the Maryland Association of Counties.

SENATE BILL 267 27
(d) (1) The transportation infrastructure part of the report shall:
(i) analyze how access to safe, reliable, and efficient transportation
infrastructure influences housing development; and
(ii) include an analysis of:
1. the capacity and condition of existing road networks and
transit services;
2. the accessibility of new and proposed housing to major
employment centers;
3. transportation infrastructure needs related to infill and
greenfield development; and
4. opportunities for multimodal connectivity, including
walking, biking, and public transit.
(2) The Department of Planning shall consult and coordinate with the
following entities in developing the transportation infrastructure part of the report:
(i) the Department of Transportation;
(ii) the Maryland Association of Counties;
(iii) the Maryland Municipal League; and
(iv) the Maryland Building Industry Association.
(e) (1) The policy recommendations part of the report shall outline actionable
recommendations, based on findings in parts one, two, and three of the comprehensive
report on housing infrastructure, for State and local governments to support housing
development.
(2) The recommendations required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall:
(i) identify legislative, regulatory, or budgetary changes to better
integrate housing and infrastructure planning;
(ii) suggest improvements to coordination mechanisms among State
agencies and local governments;
(iii) propose incentives and funding strategies to encourage
infrastructure investment in priority housing areas; and

SENATE BILL 267
(iv) highlight best practices for State agencies and local
governments.
(f) On or before December 31, 2027, the Department of Planning shall publish
the comprehensive report on housing infrastructure on its website and provide copies to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “qualified affordable housing project” has the meaning stated
in § 12–401 of the Land Use Article as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The following State departments shall conduct a comprehensive internal
review of any existing process, procedure, regulation, policy, or approval requirement under
the department’s jurisdiction that impacts the permitting, review, funding, or development
of housing in the State:
(1) the Department of Agriculture;
(2) the Department of the Environment;
(3) the Maryland Department of Health;
(4) the Department of Housing and Community Development;
(5) the Maryland Department of Labor;
(6) the Department of Natural Resources;
(7) the Department of Planning; and
(8) the Department of Transportation.
(c) (1) A comprehensive internal review for each department required under
subsection (b) of this section shall:
(i) evaluate the department’s review periods and identify instances
where the department consistently utilizes the maximum statutory or regulatory review
period and recommend bifurcated review periods to expedite approvals for simple or
low–risk housing projects;
(ii) evaluate the interpretation of laws, regulations, or other
standards that unnecessarily restrict housing projects and identify opportunities to provide
greater flexibility or alternative compliance mechanisms for existing interpretations of
laws, regulations, or other standards that unnecessarily restrict housing projects;

SENATE BILL 267 29
(iii) identify and evaluate overlapping or duplicative review
processes including the necessity of a review process where public infrastructure currently
services the housing project;
(iv) evaluate opportunities for permit coordination and joint
applications to improve coordination across departments and local governments including
coordination between the Department of the Environment, the Maryland Department of
Health, the Department of Natural Resources, and local governments for the review of
permits related to wetlands and stormwater management;
(v) identify and evaluate tailored, streamlined, or alternative
requirements for qualified affordable housing projects particularly in priority funding areas
and for projects that involve infill, redevelopment, or affordable housing;
(vi) identify opportunities to delegate project review responsibilities
performed by State entities to local governments;
(vii) identify technical barriers to housing projects that unnecessarily
delay housing projects and recommend alternatives;
(viii) identify State policies that prevent the funding or approval of
desirable housing types and recommend alternatives; and
(ix) recommend updates to streamline or provide flexibility in the
application of regulations related to critical areas and forest conservation requirements to
housing development and qualified affordable housing projects;
(2) The Maryland Department of Labor shall include in the Department’s
comprehensive internal review a review of all building code requirements including energy
efficiency requirements, fire sprinkler or suppression mandates, and building performance
standards, and recommend requirements that should be modified, streamlined, or
suspended.
(d) (1) Departments required to conduct a comprehensive internal review
under this section shall, to the extent practicable, coordinate with other departments to
align reforms and reduce redundant reviews.
(2) Departments with overlapping or similar responsibilities, including the
Department of the Environment, the Maryland Department of Health, the Department of
Natural Resources, and the State Department of Transportation, shall jointly identify
options to consolidate or parallel track the departments’ reviews.
(e) (1) On or before December 31, 2026, each department required to prepare
a comprehensive internal review under subsection (b) of this section shall submit an
interim report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly, that includes:

SENATE BILL 267
(i) a list of the department’s policies and procedures that have been
reviewed;
(ii) a summary of the delays or inefficiencies identified;
(iii) recommended statutory, regulatory, or procedural reforms;
(iv) a timeline for implementation of any internal reforms; and
(v) any legislative or budgetary requests necessary to implement
any reforms.
(2) (i) On or before July 1, 2027, each department required to prepare
a comprehensive internal review under subsection (b) of this section shall submit a final
report on the comprehensive internal review to the Department of Planning.
(ii) On or before December 31, 2027, the Department of Planning
shall compile the final reports submitted under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and
submit the compiled consolidated report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(iii) The Department of Planning shall make the consolidated report
publicly available.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 8. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7
of this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
8 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.